Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. âAuthorized entryâ means authorization to enter an event based solely on the ticket holderâs possession of a ticket not obtained in violation of section 554I.2. âAuthorized entryâ does not mean authorization to enter an event based on the source of purchase or fulfillment method of the ticket. 2. âBotâ means an automated software program that performs automatic and repetitive tasks and is designed to impersonate or replicate human activity on the internet. âBotâ does not include autofill or password management features built into an internet browser or provided through separate internet software. Senate File 146, p. 2 3. âEventâ means a concert, theatrical performance, sporting event, exhibition, show, or similar scheduled activity that is all of the following: a. Open to the public. b. Held in a public or private venue. c. Requires payment of an admission fee to attend the event. 4. âTicketâ means a physical or electronic certificate, voucher, document, token, or other evidence of a right for admission to enter an event at one or more specified dates and times. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554I.2 Internet ticket sales. A person shall not use or create a bot to do any of the following: 1. Purchase tickets in excess of the posted limit for any one internet ticket sale. 2. Use multiple internet protocol addresses, purchaser accounts, or electronic mail addresses to purchase tickets in excess of the posted limit for any one internet ticket sale. 3. Circumvent or disable an electronic queue, waiting period, presale code, or other sales volume limitation system associated with an internet ticket sale. 4. Circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure that is used to facilitate authorized entry to an event. Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554I.3 Reporting violations. 1. Upon the attorney generalâs request, a ticket seller shall report violations of this chapter of which the ticket seller has actual knowledge to the attorney general within five calendar days of the request. 2. An individual that has actual knowledge of a violation of this chapter may report the violation to the attorney general. 3. The attorney general shall establish an electronic reporting system for the submission of reports pursuant to this section. Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554I.4 Enforcement ââ penalties. A violation of section 554I.2 is an unfair practice under section 714.16 and under chapter 714H. Sec. 5. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: Senate File 146, p. 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. It is an unlawful practice for a person to violate section 554I.2. Sec. 6. Section 714H.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. Section 554I.2. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 146, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor